Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2234.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5754YH (3) 91 sc/ns H.F. 2234 Section 1. INTERIM STUDY COMMITTEE ââ AFFORDABILITY. The 1 legislative council is requested to establish a legislative 2 interim study committee to meet during the 2026 interim to 3 study and discuss issues relating to the affordability of 4 transportation, housing, energy, health care, and food in Iowa. 5 The committee shall submit its findings and recommendations to 6 the general assembly by December 31, 2026. 7